Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3441
Nebraska Violent Death Reporting System; information; sharing and storing; cooperative agreement.

The review team shall establish a cooperative agreement with the Nebraska Violent Death Reporting System to allow for the sharing and storing of all information relevant to the review team's review process, including, but not limited to, data collection and reporting within the Nebraska Violent Death Reporting System.

Laws 2025, LB414, § 4.